Montana, session 2025, HB767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Owners" or "persons" include natural persons, partnerships, corporations, trusts, and estates.
(2) "Predatory animal" has the meaning provided in 81-7-101.
Section 2. County commissioners authorized to establish predatory animal control program
for protection of goats. On the recommendation of an organized association of goat producers in the county,
the board of county commissioners may, either alone or in conjunction with the county commissioners of other
counties, establish a predatory animal control program for the protection of goats in the county or counties.
Section 3. County commissioners permitted to require per capita license fee on goats. (1) To
defray the expense of protection, the board of county commissioners may require all owners or persons in
possession of a goat 1 year 9 months of age or older in the county on the regular assessment date of each
year, as provided in 15-24-903, to pay a per capita license fee in an amount to be determined by the board. All
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 767
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 767
owners or persons in possession of a goat 1 year 9 months of age or older coming into the county after the
regular assessment date and subject to the per capita levy under the provisions of Title 15, chapter 24, part 9,
are subject to payment of the license fee.
(2) On the order of the board of county commissioners, the license fee may be imposed by
entering the name of the licensee on the assessment record of the county by the department of revenue. The
license fee is payable to and must be collected by the county treasurer. When levied, the fee is a lien on the
property, both real and personal, of the licensee. If the person against whom the license fee is levied does not
own real estate against which the license fee is or may become a lien, then the license fee is payable
immediately on its levy and the treasurer shall collect the fee in the manner provided by law for the collection of
personal property taxes that are not a lien on real estate.
(3) The fees must be placed in a predatory animal control fund, separate from the funds provided
for in 81-7-303 and 81-7-603. The money in the predatory animal control fund may be expended by the board
of county commissioners for predatory animal control, including bounties paid pursuant to Title 81, chapter 7,
part 2. Interest earned on money in the fund must be deposited in the fund.
(4) Money from any source may be deposited in the predatory animal control fund provided for in
this section to carry out the provisions of [sections 1 through 5].
Section 4. Proceeds of furs and skins taken. All furs, skins, and other portions of predatory
animals taken through the expenditure of license fees must be sold and the proceeds of the sale deposited in
the predatory animal control fund for use in carrying out the purpose of [sections 1 through 5].
Section 5. Duty of county commissioners -- petition of goat owners -- license fees. (1) In
conducting a predatory animal control program, the board of county commissioners shall give preference to
recommendations for a program made by an organized association of goat producers in the county. On petition
of the resident owners of at least 51% of the goats in the county, as shown by the property tax record of the last
preceding assessment, the board shall establish the predatory animal control program and issue licenses and
collect fees for the following year in an amount that will defray the cost of administering the program. The
petition must be filed with the board on or before the first Monday in December in any year, and a signature on
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 767
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 767
a petition may not be withdrawn by the signer after the hour set for hearing the petition. The license fee set by
the board must remain in effect from year to year without change, unless there is filed with the board a petition
signed by the resident owners of at least 51% of the goats in the county, as shown by the property tax record of
the last assessment preceding the filing of the petition, for termination of the program and elimination of the
license fee. On the filing of the petition, the board shall terminate the program and cease levying the license
fee.
(2) If the resident owners of at least 51% of the goats in the county file a petition with the board
either for an increase in the license fee or a decrease in the license fee then in effect, the board shall set a new
license fee to continue from year to year.
Section 6. Section 81-7-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"81-7-303. County commissioners permitted to require per capita license fee on sheep. (1) To
defray the expense of protection, the board of county commissioners of a county may require all owners or
persons in possession of a sheep 1 year 9 months of age or older in the county on the regular assessment date
of each year, as provided in 15-24-903, to pay a per capita license fee in an amount to be determined by the
board. All owners or persons in possession of a sheep 1 year 9 months of age or older coming into the county
after the regular assessment date and subject to the per capita levy under the provisions of Title 15, chapter 24,
part 9, are subject to payment of the license fee.
(2) Upon On the order of the board of county commissioners, the license fees fee may be imposed
by entering the name of the licensee upon on the assessment record of the county by the department of
revenue. The license fees are fee is payable to and must be collected by the county treasurer. When levied, the
fees are fee is a lien upon on the property, both real and personal, of the licensee. If the person against whom
the license fee is levied does not own real estate against which the license fee is or may become a lien, then
the license fee is payable immediately upon on its levy and the treasurer shall collect the fee in the manner
provided by law for the collection of personal property taxes that are not a lien upon on real estate.
(3) When collected, the The fees must be placed in the a predatory animal control fund separate
from the funds provided for in 81-7-603 and [section 3]. and the The money in the predatory animal control fund
may be expended on order of by the board of county commissioners of the county for predatory animal control,
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 767
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 767
including bounties paid pursuant to Title 81, chapter 7, part 2. Interest earned on money in the fund must be
deposited in the fund.
(4) Money from any source may be deposited in the predatory animal control fund provided for in
this section to carry out the provisions of this part."
Section 7. Section 81-7-603, MCA, is amended to read:
"81-7-603. County commissioners permitted to require per capita license fee on cattle. (1) To
defray the expense of protection, the board of county commissioners may require all owners or persons in
possession of cattle 9 months of age or older in the county on the regular assessment date of each year, as
provided in 15-24-903, to pay a per capita license fee in an amount to be determined by the board. All owners
or persons in possession of cattle 9 months of age or older coming into the county after the regular assessment
date and subject to the per capita levy under the provisions of Title 15, chapter 24, part 9, are subject to
payment of the license fee.
(2) Upon On the order of the board of county commissioners, the license fee may be imposed by
entering the name of the licensee on the assessment record of the county by the department of revenue. The
license fee is payable to and must be collected by the county treasurer. When levied, the fee is a lien upon on
the property, both real and personal, of the licensee. If the person against whom the license fee is levied does
not own real estate against which the license fee is or may become a lien, then the license fee is payable
immediately upon on its levy and the treasurer shall collect the fee in the manner provided by law for the
collection of personal property taxes that are not a lien upon on real estate.
(3) The fees must be placed in a predatory animal control fund separate from the fund funds
provided for in 81-7-303 and [section 3]. The money in the predatory animal control fund may be expended by
the board of county commissioners for predatory animal control, including bounties paid pursuant to Title 81,
chapter 7, part 2. Interest earned on money in the fund must be deposited in the fund.
(4) Money from any source may be deposited in the predatory animal control fund provided for in
this section to carry out the provisions of this part."
Section 8. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be codified as a new part
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 767
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 767
in Title 81, chapter 7, and the provisions of Title 81, chapter 7, apply to [sections 1 through 5].
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 767
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 767, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 767
INTRODUCED BY J. DARLING, E. TILLEMAN, W. MCKAMEY
AN ACT REVISING COUNTY PREDATOR CONTROL LAWS TO INCLUDE GOATS; AUTHORIZING COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS TO ESTABLISH A PREDATORY ANIMAL CONTROL PROGRAM FOR THE PROTECTION
OF GOATS; AUTHORIZING A PER CAPITA LICENSE FEE ON GOATS; REVISING COUNTY PREDATOR
CONTROL LAWS TO ALIGN THE AGE THRESHOLD OF PER CAPITA ANNUAL ASSESSMENT OF
LIVESTOCK; PROVIDING FOR THE DEPOSIT OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF PREDATORY ANIMAL
SKINS TAKEN; PROVIDING FOR LOCAL GOAT OWNERS TO PETITION FOR AND MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE PREDATORY ANIMAL CONTROL PROGRAM; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS;
AND AMENDING SECTIONS 81-7-303 AND 81-7-603, MCA.”